New Jersey, session 221, A3512.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Dietician shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.331 (C.45:16B-3). Licensed nutritionist shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.331 (C.45:16B-3). Medicaid means the Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.). Medical nutrition therapy shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.331 (C.45:16B-3). Medically tailored nutrition services means a suite of services that are prescribed by a medical professional and designed by a dietician or a licensed nutritionist in order to prevent, manage, or treat an individuals diet-related illness. Medically tailored nutrition services may include, but are not limited to, the provision of medical nutrition therapy, medically tailored meals, medically tailored food, and subsidies for the purchase of nutritious foods. Medically tailored foods means non-prepared, perishable and nonperishable grocery items and produce, which are selected by a dietician or a licensed nutritionist as part of a treatment plan to address an individuals diagnosed medical condition, and which are intended to provide partial or near-complete nutrition. Medically tailored meals means ready-to-eat or fully prepared meals and snacks that are designed by a dietician or a licensed nutritionist as part of a treatment plan to address an individuals diagnosed medical condition, and which are intended to provide complete or near-complete nutrition. Near-complete nutrition means foods and meals that provide greater than 50 percent of an individuals daily caloric needs. NJ FamilyCare means the program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.). Nutritious food subsidies means vouchers for free or discounted, nutrient-dense foods which are intended to provide supplemental nutrition, and which may require further preparation before consumption. 2.    a.  Notwithstanding the provision of any law to the contrary, the Medicaid program and the NJ FamilyCare program shall provide coverage for the following medically tailored nutrition services, when prescribed by an enrollees licensed physician or primary healthcare provider: (1)  medically tailored meals, in a quantity of at least ten meals per week, for an enrollee diagnosed with the following medical conditions: (a)   congestive heart failure; (b)  type 2 diabetes; (c)   chronic obstructive pulmonary disease; or (d)  renal disease; (2)  medically tailored foods, in an amount sufficient to prepare 14 meals per week, for an enrollee diagnosed with the following medical conditions: (a)   type 2 diabetes; or (b)  obesity; (3)  nutritious food subsidies, in the amount of $25 per week or greater, for an enrollee diagnosed with the following medical conditions: (a)   pre-diabetes; (b)  overweight; or (c)   hypertension; and (4)  medical nutrition therapy, in an amount and duration to be determined by the prescribing physician, for an enrollee diagnosed with the following medical conditions: (a)   diabetes; or (b)  renal disease. b.    All medically tailored nutrition services, provided pursuant to paragraph a. of this section, shall be designed and overseen by a dietician or a licensed nutritionist as part of a treatment plan to address an enrollees medical conditions. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such federal waivers or state plan amendments as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to continue to secure federal financial participation for State expenditures under the federal Medicaid program and the Children s Health Insurance Program. 4.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.